New Jersey, session 222, A1312.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Not later than 180 days after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), a paid or part-paid fire department or force shall adopt, review, and update, if needed, at least annually, a policy that addresses the job-related issues of any pregnant member of that department or force, including, but not limited to, disclosure of a pregnancy, issuance of a medical certificate by the members physician in regard to any limitations on job-related duties, and the availability of any light-duty or non-hazardous assignments.  The policy shall also provide that a pregnant firefighter will be given information as to when certain job-related tasks may not be appropriate for the member, the use of leave time for pregnancy, and the continuation of employee benefits.  In creating this policy the department or force shall be guided by the standards of the National Fire Protection Association, or of another such professional organization, that apply to the job-related issues affecting pregnant firefighters. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.